Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
VOLUNTARY DISSOLUTION

7-134-101. Dissolution by incorporators or directors if no members.

If a nonprofit corporation has no members, a majority of its directors or, if there are no directors, a majority of its incorporators may authorize the dissolution of the nonprofit corporation.

The incorporators or directors in approving dissolution shall adopt a plan of dissolution indicating to whom the assets owned or held by the nonprofit corporation will be distributed after all creditors have been paid.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 719, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-134-102. Dissolution by directors and members.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, dissolution of a nonprofit corporation may be authorized in the manner provided in subsection (2) of this section.

For a proposal to dissolve the nonprofit corporation to be authorized:

The board of directors shall adopt the proposal to dissolve;

The board of directors shall recommend the proposal to dissolve to the members entitled to vote thereon unless the board of directors determines that, because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the members; and

The members entitled to vote on the proposal to dissolve shall approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

The board of directors may condition the effectiveness of the dissolution, and the members may condition their approval of the dissolution, on any basis.

The nonprofit corporation shall give notice, in accordance with section 7-127-104, to each member entitled to vote on the proposal of the members' meeting at which the proposal to dissolve will be voted on. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposal to dissolve the nonprofit corporation, and the notice shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the proposal or a summary thereof.

Unless articles 121 to 137 of this title, the articles of incorporation, bylaws adopted by the members, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (3) of this section require a greater vote, the proposal to dissolve shall be approved by the votes required by sections 7-127-205 and 7-127-206 by every voting group entitled to vote on the proposal to dissolve.

The plan of dissolution shall indicate to whom the assets owned or held by the nonprofit corporation will be distributed after all creditors have been paid.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 720, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2008:

(2)(b) amended, p. 21, § 9, effective August 5.

7-134-103. Articles of dissolution.

At any time after dissolution is authorized, the nonprofit corporation may dissolve by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of dissolution stating:

The domestic entity name of the nonprofit corporation;

The principal office address of the nonprofit corporation's principal office; and

That the nonprofit corporation is dissolved.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1513, § 305, effective July 1, 2004.)

A nonprofit corporation is dissolved upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

Articles of dissolution need not be filed by a nonprofit corporation that is dissolved pursuant to section 7-134-401.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 720, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 1856, § 145, effective July 1; IP(1) amended, p. 1721, § 147, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(b) amended, p. 2346, § 321, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1513, § 305, effective July 1.

7-134-104. Revocation of dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 721, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

(4) amended, p. 626, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(3)(a) and (5) amended, p. 984, § 88, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(3) and (4) amended, p. 1856, § 146, effective July 1; IP(3) and (4) amended, p. 1721, § 148, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(3), (3)(a), (4), and (5) amended, p. 2347, § 322, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 1513, § 306, effective July 1.

7-134-105. Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved nonprofit corporation continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any activities except as is appropriate to wind up and liquidate its affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Returning, transferring, or conveying assets held by the nonprofit corporation upon a condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the dissolution, in accordance with such condition;

Transferring, subject to any contractual or legal requirements, its assets as provided in or authorized by its articles of incorporation or bylaws;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities;

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its assets and affairs.

Upon dissolution of a nonprofit corporation exempt under section 501 (c)(3) of the internal revenue code or corresponding section of any future federal tax code, the assets of such nonprofit corporation shall be distributed for one or more exempt purposes under said section, or to the federal government, or to a state or local government, for a public purpose. Any such assets not so disposed of shall be disposed of by the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the nonprofit corporation's principal office is located, or, if the nonprofit corporation has no principal office in this state, by the district court of the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or, if the nonprofit corporation has no registered agent, the district court of the city and county of Denver exclusively for such purposes or to such organization or organizations, as said court shall determine, that are formed and operated exclusively for such purposes.

Dissolution of a nonprofit corporation does not:

Transfer title to the nonprofit corporation's property;

Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in article 128 of this title;

Change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or members, change provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers, or both, or change provisions for amending its bylaws or its articles of incorporation;

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the nonprofit corporation in its entity name; or

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the nonprofit corporation on the effective date of dissolution.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2347, § 323, effective July 1, 2004.)

A dissolved nonprofit corporation may dispose of claims against it pursuant to sections 7-90-911 and 7-90-912.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 722, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(3)(d) and (4) amended, p. 985, § 89, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 2347, § 323, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

(5) added, p. 883, § 83, effective July 1.

7-134-106. Disposition of known claims by notification. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 723, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

7-134-107. Disposition of claims by publication. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 724, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2)(a) amended, p. 2348, § 324, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

7-134-108. Enforcement of claims against dissolved nonprofit corporation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 725, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

7-134-109. Service on dissolved nonprofit corporation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 725, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(4) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)